test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - xà_gàd : #
     1Sg+Impf+V+xà_gàd:  xàsigàd
     2Sg+Impf+V+xà_gàd:  xàsigàd
     3Sg+Impf+V+xà_gàd:  xàsigàd
     4SgO+Impf+V+xà_gàd: xàsigàd
     1PlO+Impf+V+xà_gàd: xàsigàd
     2PlO+Impf+V+xà_gàd: xàsigàd
     3PlO+Impf+V+xà_gàd: xàsigàd
